Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.040

Referral records—Agreement records.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Each agency shall keep records of all referrals rendered to or on behalf of clients. These records must contain:

(a) The name of the vulnerable adult, and the address and phone number of the client or the client's representative, if any;

(b) The kind of supportive housing or care services for which referral was sought;

(c) The location of the care services or supportive housing referred to the client and probable duration, if known;

(d) The monthly or unit cost of the supportive housing or care services, if known;

(e) If applicable, the amount of the agency's fee to the client or to the provider;

(f) If applicable, the dates and amounts of refund of the agency's fee, if any, and reason for such refund; and

(g) A copy of the client's disclosure and intake forms described in RCW 18.330.050 and 18.330.060.

(2) Each agency shall also keep records of any contract or written agreement entered into with any provider for services rendered to or on behalf of a vulnerable adult, including any referrals to a provider. Any provision in a contract or written agreement not consistent with this chapter is void and unenforceable.

(3) The agency must maintain the records covered by this chapter for a period of six years. The agency's records identifying a client are considered "health care information" and the provisions of chapter 70.02 RCW apply but only to the extent that such information meets the definition of "health care information" under *RCW 70.02.010(7). The client must have access upon request to the agency's records concerning the client and covered by this chapter.

[2011 c 357 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 70.02.010 was amended by 2013 c 200 s 1, changing subsection (7) to subsection (16). RCW 70.02.010 was subsequently amended by 2018 c 201 s 8001, changing subsection (16) to subsection (17).